Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
PART 1 General Provisions

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 149, § 1 designated existing Code Sections 45-13-60 through 45-13-62 as Part 1 of Article 4 of Chapter 13 of this title.

45-13-60 through 45-13-62.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 350, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1997, p. 455, § 3; repealed by Ga. L. 2011, p. 617, § 2/SB 190, effective July 1, 2011.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 617, § 2/SB 190 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 2011.